Rhode Island statutes. Title 9 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure Generally
Chapter 28 Proceedings in Aid of Execution

9-28-1.
Creditor’s equitable action.

Any judgment creditor, after his or her execution has been returned wholly or in part unsatisfied, may, by a civil action in the nature of a creditor’s bill, reach and apply and subject to the payment and satisfaction of his or her judgment any equitable estate, any equitable assets, or any choses in action of the judgment debtor, except such as shall be exempt from attachment by virtue of statutory provision. The remedy provided by this section shall be cumulative and shall not supersede any existing remedy.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 4; P.L. 1927, ch. 973, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 556, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 55, § 47.

9-28-2.
Transmission of superior court papers to district court to which writ returnable.

Upon ex parte motion of any party for whom judgment is rendered in the superior court in a case in which the writ was returnable to a district court and whose execution has been returned either wholly or in part unpaid and unsatisfied, the superior court in its discretion may transmit to the district court to which the writ in the case was made returnable all the papers in the case for hearing under the provisions of §§

9-28-3

—

9-28-7

, there to be kept until their return shall be ordered by the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1368, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2014, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-2

.

9-28-3.
Citation — Payment agreement — Hearing to show cause, payment in full or by installments.

On the filing of an application by a judgment creditor, execution on whose judgment has been returned either wholly or in part unsatisfied and unpaid, the clerk or a justice of the court rendering the judgment, or if the judgment is rendered in the superior court in a case in which the writ was returnable to a district court, then and in such case the clerk or justice of the district court to which the writ was returnable, if the papers in the case shall have been transmitted to the district court as hereinafter provided, shall issue a citation to the judgment debtor requiring the judgment debtor to contact the attorney for the judgment creditor or pro se judgment creditor within twenty-five (25) days of receipt of the citation to establish a payment agreement. If the debtor defendant fails to contact the attorney for the judgment creditor or pro se judgment creditor within twenty-five (25) days, the attorney for the judgment creditor or pro se judgment creditor may request that the district court clerk’s office mail a notice with a date and time of hearing to the defendant. Upon notice from the district court, the defendant shall appear at the time and place named therein to show cause why an examination into his or her circumstances should not be made and a decree be entered ordering him or her to pay the judgment in full or by installment, weekly, monthly, or otherwise.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1368, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2014, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-3

; P.L. 2022, ch. 202, § 1, effective June 27, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 203, § 1, effective June 27, 2022.

Particular Cases.

Trial court properly entered a judgment in a judgment creditor’s favor because the judgment debtor’s claim was barred by the doctrine of collateral estoppel where both parties were also the parties to a previous proceeding that resulted in a final judgment on the merits in the creditor’s favor, and the precise argument that the judgment debtor made in the instant appeal—challenging the trial court’s jurisdiction regarding the lack of a return of an execution—had already been addressed and decided. Trainor v. Grieder, 91 A.3d 360,

2014 R.I. LEXIS 63

(R.I. 2014).

9-28-4.
Appearance of judgment debtor — Hearing on citation.

A judgment debtor upon whom the citation shall be served as provided in §

9-28-3

shall be obliged to appear in court in person in response to the citation as therein commanded, and for failure to so appear, may be proceeded against as provided by chapter 17 of this title in the case of a witness duly summoned who fails to appear as commanded. At the hearing on the citation, the court shall make inquiry by examination of the judgment debtor, or otherwise, as to his or her circumstances, his or her income from any source, and his or her ability to pay the judgment; and if the debtor fails to appear at the time and place fixed the inquiry may proceed in his or her absence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1368, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2014, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-4

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 84.

9-28-5.
Decree for installment payments on judgment — Finding of inability to pay.

If the court finds that the debtor is able to pay the judgment in full or by partial payments, from time to time, it shall, after first allowing the debtor out of his or her income a reasonable sum for the support of himself or herself or the support of himself or herself and family, if he or she has a family, enter a decree fixing the time, place, and amount of payments to be made by the debtor on the judgment out of his or her income in excess of the allowance. If the court entering the decree finds that the debtor is not able at the time to pay the judgment in full or by partial payments, from time to time, it shall enter a finding to that effect which shall be subject to revision on like notice and inquiry and on proof of changed circumstances of the debtor; but no subsequent citation to the debtor shall issue until the creditor or some one in his or her behalf has filed in court an affidavit setting forth evidence of such a change in the circumstances of the debtor as shall satisfy the court that a new inquiry as to the debtor’s ability to pay the judgment shall be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 1; P.L. 1916, ch. 1368, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2014, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-5

.

9-28-6.
Enforcement of decree.

If the debtor at any time fails to comply with the decree, the court entering the decree may cause him or her to be cited to show cause for the noncompliance; and unless the debtor shows good cause therefor, the court may order that unless he or she complies with the decree, or with such modification thereof as the court may then make, within the time stated in the order, the failure shall be a contempt of court; and if at the expiration of the time fixed by the court for compliance with the new decree the debtor still fails or refuses to comply therewith, the court may enforce its decree by proceedings for contempt. And if a defendant is in the custody of or committed to jail by a member of the division of sheriffs, or imprisoned, either upon execution or by order of the court in contempt proceedings, it shall not operate in any degree as a payment or satisfaction of the judgment upon which the execution is issued, or concerning which the order is entered, nor shall the custody, commitment to jail, or imprisonment be or constitute any bar, delay, or hindrance to any legal or equitable proceedings to discover or reach any assets, legal or equitable, of the defendant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 2; P.L. 1916, ch. 1368, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-6

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 20.

9-28-7.
Revision or suspension of decree.

The court may, at any time on written notice to the adverse party or his or her attorney of record, for cause shown, revise, modify, or suspend a decree made in any proceedings under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1228, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 354, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 555, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

9-28-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 24.